sk-SK: Elektronika > Tlač, kopírovanie, skenovanie a faxovanie > Príslušenstvo k tlačiarňam, kopírkam a faxom: Automatické podávače dokumentov; Káble a napájacie šnúry tlačiarní; Spotrebný materiál do tlačiarní; Duplexné jednotky tlačiarní; Pamäť tlačiarne; Držiaky a konzoly tlačiarní; Doštičky tlačiarní; Stojany na tlačiarne; Puzdrá na tlačiarne, kopírky a faxy; Súpravy na čistenie tlačiarní, kopírok a faxov; Náhradné diely pre tlačiarne, kopírky a faxy; Rotačné a stolové prílohy
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Impressão, cópia, digitalização e fax > Acessórios de impressora, copiadora e fax: Alimentadores automáticos de documentos; Cabos e fios de alimentação de impressora; Consumíveis de impressora; Duplexadores de impressora; Memória de impressora; Suportes e braços de impressora; Platinas de impressora; Suportes de impressora; Estojos de transporte para impressoras, fotocopiadoras e faxes; Kits de limpeza para impressoras, fotocopiadoras e faxes; Peças sobressalentes de impressora, copiadora e fax; Acessórios rotativos e de base
lt-LT: Elektronika > Spausdinimas, kopijavimas, nuskaitymas ir faksas > Spausdintuvų, kopijavimo aparatų ir fakso aparatų priedai: Automatiniai dokumentų tiekikliai; Spausdintuvo kabeliai ir maitinimo laidai; Spausdintuvų eksploatacinės medžiagos; Dvipusio spausdinimo įrenginiai; Spausdintuvo atmintinės; Spausdintuvo laikikliai ir kronšteinai; Spausdintuvo plokštės; Spausdintuvų stovai; Spausdintuvų, kopijavimo aparatų ir fakso aparatų dėklai; Spausdintuvų, kopijavimo aparatų ir fakso aparatų valymo rinkiniai; Spausdintuvų, kopijavimo aparatų ir fakso aparatų atsarginės dalys; Sukamieji ir pagrindo priedai
hr-HR: Elektronika > Ispis, kopiranje, skeniranje i faksiranje > Dodaci za pisače, fotokopirne i faks uređaje: Automatski uvlakači dokumenata; Kabeli i napajanje pisača; Potrošni materijal za pisače; Duplekseri za pisače; Memorija pisača; Nosači i stalci za pisač; Ploče pisača; Stalci za pisače; Torbe za pisače, fotokopirne uređaje i fakseve; Kompleti za čišćenje pisača, fotokopirnih uređaja i faksa; Zamjenski dijelovi za pisače, fotokopirne uređaje i faks uređaje; Rotacijski dodaci i dodaci za podlogu
sv: Elektronik > Utskrift, kopiering, skanning och fax > Tillbehör till skrivare, kopiator och fax: Automatiska dokumentmatare; Skrivarkablar och -nätsladdar; Förbrukningsvaror för skrivare; Duplexenheter för skrivare; Skrivarminnen; Skrivarfästen och -beslag; Skrivartryckplattor; Skrivarställ; Bärväskor för skrivare, kopiatorer och fax; Rengöringsenheter för skrivare, kopiatorer och faxmaskiner; Reservdelar till skrivare, kopiator och fax; Roterande och bäddtillbehör
tr: Elektronik > Yazıcı, Fotokopi, Tarayıcı ve Faks > Yazıcı, Fotokopi Makinesi ve Faks Makinesi Aksesuarları: Otomatik Belge Besleyiciler; Yazıcı Kabloları ve Güç Kordonları; Yazıcı Sarf Malzemeleri; Yazıcı Çift Taraflı Baskı Üniteleri; Yazıcı Belleği; Yazıcı Montaj Aparatları ve Braketleri; Yazıcı Tablaları; Yazıcı Stantları; Yazıcı, Fotokopi ve Faks Taşıma Çantaları; Yazıcı, Fotokopi ve Faks Temizleme Setleri; Yazıcı, Fotokopi Makinesi ve Faks Makinesi Yedek Parçaları; Döner ve Yatak Eklentileri
ru: Электроника > Печать, копирование, сканирование и работа с факсами > Аксессуары для принтеров, копиров и факсов: Автоматические податчики документов; Кабели и шнуры питания для принтеров; Расходные материалы для принтеров; Блоки двухсторонней печати; Память для принтеров; Крепления и кронштейны для принтеров; Валы для принтеров; Подставки для принтеров; Сумки для принтеров, копиров и факсов; Наборы для очистки принтеров, копиров и факсов; Запасные детали для принтеров, копиров и факсов; Поворотные и плоскостные приставки
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > พิมพ์ คัดลอก สแกน และแฟกซ์ > อุปกรณ์เครื่องพิมพ์ เครื่องถ่ายเอกสาร และแฟกซ์: ตัวป้อนเอกสารอัตโนมัติ; สายเคเบิลและสายไฟเครื่องพิมพ์; ของสิ้นเปลืองสำหรับเครื่องพิมพ์; อุปกรณ์พิมพ์สองหน้าพร้อมกันของเครื่องพิมพ์; หน่วยความจำเครื่องพิมพ์; ขาตั้งและขายึดเครื่องพิมพ์; แท่นวางกระดาษเครื่องพิมพ์; ที่ตั้งเครื่องพิมพ์; กระเป๋าใส่เครื่องพิมพ์ เครื่องถ่ายเอกสาร และแฟกซ์; ชุดทำความสะอาดเครื่องพิมพ์ เครื่องถ่ายเอกสาร และแฟกซ์; อุปกรณ์อะไหล่สำหรับเครื่องพิมพ์ เครื่องถ่ายเอกสาร และแฟกซ์; อุปกรณ์เสริมแบบหมุนและแท่นวาง
cs: Elektronika > Tisk, kopírování, skenování a faxování > Příslušenství k tiskárnám, kopírkám, skenerům a faxům: Automatické podavače dokumentů; Tiskové kabely a napájecí šňůry; Spotřební zboží pro tiskárny; Jednotky oboustranného tisku; Paměti do tiskáren; Držáky a konzoly tiskáren; Tiskové válce; Stojany na tiskárny; Přenosná pouzdra na tiskárny, kopírky a faxy; Sady na čištění tiskáren, kopírek a faxů; Náhradní díly k tiskárnám, kopírkám, skenerům a faxům; Rotační a ložná příslušenství
pl: Elektronika > Drukowanie, kopiowanie, skanowanie i faksowanie > Akcesoria do kopiarek, drukarek i faksów: Automatyczne podajniki dokumentów; Kable drukarki i przewody zasilające; Materiały eksploatacyjne do drukarek; Dupleksy do drukarek; Pamięci do drukarek; Uchwyty i wsporniki drukarki; Płyty drukujące; Stojaki do drukarek; Futerały na drukarki, kopiarki i faksy; Zestawy do czyszczenia drukarek, kopiarek i faksów; Części zamienne do kopiarek, drukarek i faksów; Mocowania obrotowe i łóżka
fr: Appareil électronique > Impression, copie, numérisation et télécopie > Accessoires pour imprimantes, copieurs et télécopieurs: Chargeurs automatiques de documents; Câbles et cordons d’alimentation pour imprimante; Matériel pour imprimante; Duplexeurs pour imprimante; Mémoire pour imprimante; Supports et fixations pour imprimante; Platines d’imprimante; Supports pour imprimante; Mallettes de transport pour imprimantes, copieurs et fax; Kits de nettoyage pour imprimantes, copieurs et fax; Pièces de rechange pour imprimantes, copieurs et télécopieurs; Accessoires rotatifs et de platine
ja: 電子機器 > プリンター・コピー機 > プリンター・コピー機関連用品: 自動原稿送り装置; プリンターケーブルと電源コード; プリンター消耗品; プリンター用デュプレクサ; プリンター用メモリ; プリンターマウントとブラケット; プリンタープラテン; プリンター用スタンド; プリンター、コピー機、FAX持ち運び用ケース; プリンター、コピー機、FAXクリーニングキット; プリンター・コピー機用交換部品; ロータリー・ベッドアタッチメント
es: Electrónica > Fax, escáner, copiadora e impresora > Accesorios para máquinas de fax, impresoras y fotocopiadoras: Alimentadores automáticos de documentos; Cables de impresora y cordones de alimentación; Consumibles para impresoras; Duplexores para impresora; Memoria para impresora; Soportes y abrazaderas de impresora; Platinas de impresora; Bases para impresoras; Maletines para impresoras, fotocopiadoras y faxes; Kits de limpieza para impresoras, fotocopiadoras y faxes; Piezas de repuesto para máquinas de fax, impresoras y fotocopiadoras; Accesorios rotatorios y de cama
hu: Elektronika > Nyomtatás, másolás, szkennelés és faxolás > Nyomtató-, fénymásoló- és faxgép-kiegészítők: Automatikus dokumentumadagolók; Nyomtatókábelek és -tápkábelek; Nyomtató fogyóeszközök; Nyomtató duplexek; Nyomtatómemória; Nyomtatótartók és -rögzítők; Nyomtató-nyomólemezek; Nyomtatóállványok; Nyomtató-, fénymásoló- és faxhordozó tokok; Nyomtató-, fénymásoló- és faxtisztító készletek; Nyomtató-, fénymásoló- és faxgép-cserealkatrészek; Forgó és ágyrögzítők
nb: Elektronikk > Utskrift, kopi, skann og faks > Tilbehør til skrivere, kopimaskiner og faksmaskiner: Automatiske dokumentmatere; Skriverkabler og strømledninger; Forbruksmateriell til skrivere; Skriverdupleksere; Skriverminne; Skriverfester og braketter; Skrivervalser; Skriverstativer; Bærevesker for skrivere, kopimaskiner og telefaksmaskiner; Rengjøringssett for skrivere, kopimaskiner og telefaksmaskiner; Reservedeler til skrivere, kopimaskiner og faksmaskiner; Roterende og plattformtilkoblinger
nl: Elektronica > Afdrukken, kopiëren, scannen en faxen > Accessoires voor printers, kopieerapparaten en faxmachines: Automatische documentinvoeren; Printerkabels en stroomkabels; Verbruiksartikelen voor printer; Duplexeenheden voor printers; Printergeheugen; Printerbeugels en muurbeugels; Printerplatens; Printertafels; Draagdozen voor printers, kopieerapparaten en faxmachines; Reinigingskits voor printers, kopieerapparaten en faxmachines; Vervangingsonderdelen voor voor printers, kopieerapparaten en faxmachines; Roterende en bedaccessoires
sl-SI: Elektronika > Tiskanje, kopiranje, skeniranje in faksiranje > Dodatki za tiskalnike, kopirne stroje in fakse: Avtomatski podajalniki dokumentov; Kabli in napajalni kabli za tiskalnike; Potrošni material za tiskalnike; Obojestranski tiskalniki; Pomnilnik za tiskalnike; Nosilci in pritrdilne konzole za tiskalnike; Pritiskalne plošče za tiskalnike (platine); Stojala za tiskalnike; Torbice za tiskalnike, kopirne stroje in fakse; Kompleti za čiščenje tiskalnikov, kopirnih strojev in faksov; Nadomestni deli za tiskalnike, kopirne stroje in fakse; Rotacijski in posteljni dodatki
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 多功能事務機 > 印表機/影印機/傳真機配件: 自動進紙器; 印表機纜線及電源線; 印表機耗材; 雙面列印單元; 印表機記憶體; 印表機安裝架; 印表機軸承; 印表機置物架; 印表機、影印機和傳真機攜帶箱; 印表機、影印機和傳真機清潔工具包; 印表機/影印機/傳真機替換零件; 旋轉及床面附件
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 打印/复印/扫描/传真 > 打印机、复印机和传真机配件: 自动送稿器; 打印机线缆和电源线; 打印机耗材; 打印机双面打印器; 打印机存储器; 打印机支架; 打印机压板; 打印机支架; 打印机、复印机和传真机便携箱; 打印机、复印机和传真机清洁套件; 打印机、复印机和传真机更换部件; 旋转与平板附件
bg-BG: Електроника > Печат, копиране, сканиране и факс > Аксесоари за принтери, копирни машини и факс машини: Устройства за автоматично подаване на документи; Кабели и захранващи кабели за принтер; Консумативи за принтери; Устройства за принтери за двустранно печатане; Принтерна памет; Стойки и скоби за принтер; Капаци за документи на принтер; Стойки за принтери; Чанти за принтери, копирни и факс машини; Комплекти за почистване на принтери, копирни и факс машини; Резервни части за принтери, копирни и факс машини; Ротационни приставки и легла
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Impressão, cópia, digitalização e fax > Acessórios de máquinas de fax, copiadoras e impressoras: Alimentadores automáticos de documentos; Cabos e cordões de alimentação para impressora; Itens para impressora; Duplexadores para impressora; Memória da impressora; Suportes e brackets para impressora; Platinas para impressora; Suportes para impressora; Estojos de transporte para impressora, copiadora e fax; Kits de limpeza para impressoras, copiadoras e faxes; Peças de reposição para máquinas de fax, copiadoras e impressoras; Acessórios rotativos e de mesa
it: Elettronica > Stampa, copia, scansione e fax > Accessori per stampanti, fotocopiatrici e fax: Alimentatori automatici di documenti; Cavi per stampante e cavi di alimentazione; Materiali di consumo stampante; Duplexer stampante; Memoria stampanti; Supporti e staffe per stampante; Platine della stampante; Supporti per stampante; Custodie per stampanti, fotocopiatrici e fax; Kit di pulizia per stampanti, fotocopiatrici e fax; Parti di ricambio per stampanti, fotocopiatrici e fax; Accessori rotativi e per piano
de: Elektronik > Drucken, Kopieren, Scannen & Faxen > Zubehör für Drucker, Kopierer & Faxgeräte: Automatische Dokumentenzuführungen; Druckerkabel und Stromkabel; Drucker-Verbrauchsmaterial; Drucker-Duplexeinheiten; Druckerspeicher; Druckerhalterungen und -befestigungen; Druckerplatten; Druckertische; Transporttaschen für Drucker, Kopierer und Faxgeräte; Reinigungskits für Drucker, Kopierer und Faxgeräte; Ersatzteile für Drucker, Kopierer & Faxgeräte; Dreh- und Bettaufsätze
ro-RO: Electronice > Imprimare, copiere, scanare și fax > Accesorii pentru imprimante, copiatoare și faxuri: Alimentatoare automate de documente; Cabluri și cabluri de alimentare pentru imprimante; Consumabile pentru imprimante; Duplexoare imprimantă; Memorie imprimantă; Suporturi și console pentru imprimante; Platine pentru imprimante; Standuri pentru imprimante; Cutii de transport pentru imprimante, copiatoare și faxuri; Seturi de curățare pentru imprimante, copiatoare și faxuri; Piese de schimb pentru imprimante, copiatoare și faxuri; Atașamente rotative și pentru platformă
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > In, photocopy, quét & fax > Phụ kiện máy in, máy photocopy và máy fax: Máy cấp tài liệu tự động; Cáp và dây nguồn máy in; Vật tư máy in; Bộ phận in song công của máy in; Bộ nhớ máy in; Giá và kẹp gắn máy in; Bàn lót máy in; Kệ máy in; Hộp đựng máy in, máy photocopy và máy fax; Bộ dụng cụ vệ sinh máy in, máy photocopy và máy fax; Linh kiện máy in, máy photocopy và máy fax; Phụ kiện quay và bàn
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Εκτύπωση, Αντιγραφή, Σάρωση & Φαξ > Αξεσουάρ εκτυπωτών, φωτοαντιγραφικών & φαξ: Αυτόματοι τροφοδότες εγγράφων; Καλώδια & τροφοδοτικά εκτυπωτή; Αναλώσιμα εκτυπωτών; Μονάδες διπλής όψης εκτύπωσης; Μνήμη εκτυπωτών; Βάσεις & στηρίγματα εκτυπωτή; Πλάκες εκτυπωτή; Βάσεις εκτυπωτών; Θήκες μεταφοράς εκτυπωτών, φωτοαντιγραφικών & φαξ; Κιτ καθαρισμού εκτυπωτών, φωτοαντιγραφικών & φαξ; Ανταλλακτικά εκτυπωτών, φωτοαντιγραφικών & φαξ; Περιστροφικά εξαρτήματα και εξαρτήματα κρεβατιού
fi: Elektroniikka > Tulostus, kopiointi, skannaus ja faksaus > Tulostinten, kopiokoneiden ja faksien lisätarvikkeet: Automaattinen asiakirjansyöttölaite; Tulostinkaapeli ja virtajohto; Tulostintarvikkeet; Kaksipuolisen tulostuksen lisälaitteet; Tulostimen muisti; Tulostimen teline ja kiinnike; Tulostinpainolevy; Tulostintelineet; Tulostimen, kopiokoneen ja faksin kantokotelot; Tulostimen, kopiokoneen ja faksin puhdistussarjat; Tulostimen, kopiokoneen ja faksin varaosat; Pyörivä ja alustaliitäntä
da: Elektronik > Udskriv, kopiér, scan og fax > Tilbehør til printer, kopimaskine og fax: Automatiske dokumentfødere; Printer – kabler og strømledninger; Printer – forbrugsstoffer; Printer – duplekser; Printer – hukommelse; Printer – beslag og -holdere; Printer platen-ruller; Printer – borde; Bæretasker til printer, kopimaskine og fax; Rengøringssæt til printer, kopimaskine og fax; Reservedele til printer, kopimaskine og fax; Roterings- og bundtilbehør
en: Electronics > Print, Copy, Scan & Fax > Printer, Copier & Fax Machine Accessories: Automatic Document Feeders; Printer Cables & Power Cords; Printer Consumables; Printer Duplexers; Printer Memory; Printer Mounts & Brackets; Printer Platens; Printer Stands; Printer, Copier & Fax Carrying Cases; Printer, Copier & Fax Cleaning Kits; Printer, Copier & Fax Machine Replacement Parts; Rotary & Bed Attachments
ko: 전자기기 > 인쇄/ 복사/스캔/팩스 > 프린터/복사기/팩스 부대용품: 자동 문서 급지 장치; 프린터 케이블 및 전원 코드; 프린터 소모품; 프린터 양면인쇄기; 프린터 메모리; 프린터 마운트 및 브래킷; 프린터 플래튼; 프린터 받침대; 프린터/복사기/팩스 운반 케이스; 프린터/복사기/팩스 청소 키트; 프린터/복사기/팩스 교체 부품; 로터리 및 베드 어태치먼트